test/src/morphology/V-andw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - andõ: # Verb 27 'eng /est anda/fin' - full paradigm
     andõ+V+Inf: andõ
     andõ+V+Ger: andõs
     andõ+V+Sup: āndam
     andõ+V+Sup+Ine: āndamõs
     andõ+V+Sup+Ela: āndamõst
     andõ+V+Sup+Tra: āndamõks
     andõ+V+Sup+Abe: āndamõt
     andõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āndab
     andõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: āndat
     andõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: āndabõd
     andõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āndiz
     andõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āndizt, āndiztõ]
     andõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āndizt, āndiztõ]
     andõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: and
     andõ+V+Cond+Sg3: āndaks
     andõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ānda
     andõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: andõ
     andõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: āndagid
     andõ+V+Jus+Sg3: āndag
     andõ+V+QuoSg3: āndaji
     andõ+V+ActPrfPrc: andõn
     andõ+V+PssPrfPrc: andtõd
